Alaska, session 34, HB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 42.40.420 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 42.40.420. Public use of railroad land. (a) Upon request of a 05 municipality or the state, the corporation may authorize use of railroad land for public 06 purposes. Subject to AS 42.40.350(b) and (b) of this section, the corporation shall 07 authorize a walkway or a trail if the board first finds in writing that the proposed 08 walkway or trail will not create a safety hazard and will not unreasonably interfere 09 with continued or expanded operations in the utility corridor. 10 (b) Before authorizing a use under this section, the corporation [BOARD] 11 shall require the municipality or state to 12 (1) execute an agreement in a form approved by the board to 13 (A) [(1)] agree to restrictions, limitations, and conditions on the 14 proposed use required by the corporation and reasonably calculated to reduce 15 the risk of a safety hazard or interference with authorized uses in the utility 01 corridor; 02 (B) [(2)] hold the corporation harmless from and indemnify the 03 corporation for liability and claims arising from any use authorized under this 04 section including 05 (i) [(A)] defending the corporation in a cause of action 06 brought against the corporation as a result of the use; and 07 (ii) [(B)] indemnifying the corporation for the amount 08 of a judgment, including prejudgment and postjudgment interest, 09 rendered against the corporation, and for all costs and attorney 10 [ATTORNEY'S] fees incurred by the corporation in settling or 11 defending the claim; and 12 (C) [(3)] stop the use upon request of the corporation if the use 13 interferes with expansion or replacement of railroad facilities, creates a safety 14 hazard, or interferes with railroad operations; and 15 (2) obtain a notarized written statement from the owner of real 16 property subject to an easement in favor of the corporation consenting to the use 17 of that property and record the statement in the recorder's office of the recording 18 district in which the property is located. 19 * Sec. 2. AS 42.40.460(g) is amended to read: 20 (g) In delegating management authority over or conveying all or a portion of 21 state land to the corporation, the Department of Natural Resources shall reserve the 22 right to authorize, by lease, permit, or other method, a person to cross or construct 23 access across the transportation corridor and associated rail land; however, before 24 authorizing a crossing or construction of access, the department shall obtain 25 concurrence from the corporation that the proposed crossing or construction is 26 consistent with applicable safety standards and, to the extent practical, minimizes 27 effects on railroad operating efficiency. Neither the corporation nor the state is liable 28 for claims arising from public use of the transportation corridor and associated rail 29 land, except to the extent the claims arise from the gross negligence of the state, the 30 corporation, their employees, or their contractors, respectively. The department shall 31 indemnify the corporation consistent with AS 42.40.420(b)(1) [AS 42.40.420(1) - (3)] 01 for claims or related litigation arising from an authorization issued by the department 02 under this section, except to the extent the claims arise from the gross negligence of 03 the corporation, its employees, or its contractors. 04 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 APPLICABILITY. AS 42.40.420, as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to uses of 07 railroad land authorized on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.